Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 6.1 Maintenance of Marine Waterways and Boating Facilities

46-6.1-1.
Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Marine Waterways and Boating Facilities Act of 2001.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1.

46-6.1-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares:

Marine transportation in the state depends on adequate depth in waterways and harbors to permit the safe passage and operation of vessels.

Recreational and commercial boating depends on the availability of channels, harbors, marinas, and mooring areas with adequate depth to permit the safe passage, movement, mooring, docking, servicing and operating vessels.

Coastal features, such as salt ponds, can be impaired as habitat if channels and breachways do not allow adequate water circulation.

Dredging and appropriate dredged material management and disposal are in the interest of the state in order to protect public health and safety, to enhance environmental quality, and to preserve the recreational opportunities and promote the economic well-being of the people of the state.

General assembly recognizes and declares that the coastal resources of Rhode Island, a rich variety of natural, commercial, industrial, recreational, and aesthetic assets, are of immediate and potential value to the present and future development of this state; that unplanned or poorly planned development of this basic natural environment has already damaged or destroyed, or has the potential of damaging or destroying, the state’s coastal resources, and has restricted the most efficient and beneficial utilization of these resources; that it shall be the policy of this state to preserve, protect, develop, and, where possible, restore the coastal resources of the state for this and succeeding generations through comprehensive and coordinated long range planning and management designed to produce the maximum benefit for society from these coastal resources; and that preservation and restoration of ecological systems shall be the primary guiding principle upon which environmental alteration of coastal resources will be measured, judged, and regulated.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1.

46-6.1-3.
Purpose.

The purposes of this chapter are:

To establish an integrated, coherent plan for dredging and dredge material management, which includes beneficial use, dewatering, in-water disposal, and upland disposal as appropriate, that sets forth the state’s program for these activities and provides guidance to persons planning to engage in these activities and to designate the council as the lead agency for implementing the purposes of this chapter.

To provide for coordinated, timely decision-making by state agencies on applications for dredging, dewatering, and for the beneficial use and in-water and upland disposal of dredged materials, with the goals of providing action, following a determination that the application is complete, on applications for these activities within one hundred eighty (180) days for applications pertaining to maintenance dredging projects and within five hundred forty (540) days for expansion projects.

To establish, for the purposes of this chapter and consistent with the requirements of the Marine Infrastructure Maintenance Act of 1996, the following in order of priority in planning for and management of dredged material, depending on the nature and characteristics of the dredged material and on reasonable cost.

Beneficial use, including specifically beach nourishment and habitat restoration and creation, in the coastal zone;

Beneficial use in upland areas;

Disposal.

To encourage the development of the infrastructure needed to dewater dredged materials, and to facilitate beneficial use of dredged materials in upland areas.

To encourage and facilitate the beneficial use of dredged materials by private parties.

To authorize the establishment of a means of supporting projects for dewatering dredged material and for beneficial use and disposal of dredged material at sites above mean high water by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 14.

46-6.1-4.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall mean:

“Beneficial use” means the placement or use of dredged material for some productive purpose, and shall include, but not be limited to, uses such as beach nourishment, habitat creation and enhancement, brownfields redevelopment, landscaping, construction projects, and landfill cover.

“Coastal zone” means the coastal waters of the state and adjacent lands and other areas that are under the regulatory jurisdiction of the coastal resources management council pursuant to chapter 23 of this title or the federal Coastal Zone Management Act [16 U.S.C. § 1451 et seq.].

“Council” means the coastal resources management council.

“Dewatering” means actively or passively removing water from dredged material to facilitate its beneficial use or disposal.

“Department” means the department of environmental management.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Disposal” means nontemporary relocation and placement of dredged material other than a beneficial use.

“Disposal site” means a precise geographic area within which dredged material is disposed.

“Dredged material” means material excavated from the waters of the state, including rock, gravel, sand, clay, silt, mud, organic material, and material discarded by humans.

“Executive director” means the executive director of the coastal resources management council.

“Habitat” means the specific area or environment in which a particular plant or animal lives.

“Person” means any individual, group of individuals, firm, corporation, association, partnership or private or public entity, including a district, county, city, town, or other governmental unit or agent thereof, and in the case of a corporation, any individual having active and general supervision of the properties of such corporation.

“Site” means all contiguous land, structures, and appurtenances and improvements.

“Site operator” means the person who is responsible for the operation of activities at a beneficial use, dewatering, or disposal site for dredged materials.

“Site owner” means the person who owns all or a part of a beneficial use, dewatering, or disposal site for dredged materials.

“Upland areas” means areas that are not in the coastal zone.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 40.

46-6.1-5.
Comprehensive plan for dredged material management.

The council shall prepare, adopt and maintain, pursuant to §

46-23-1(e)

, a comprehensive plan for dredged material management for dredging that takes place in the coastal zone. The plan shall include, among other matters:

Coastal zone and upland areas that are deemed suitable, depending on the nature and characteristics of the dredged material, for the beneficial use and disposal of dredged material;

Approved sites and/or types of areas suitable for dewatering; and

Protocols for monitoring dredged material disposal sites in the coastal zone.

The director shall by January 31, 2002, adopt by rule a list of upland sites and types of areas suitable for beneficial use and disposal of dredged materials, and shall adopt such revisions as may be necessary to the list no less frequently than biennially thereafter, which list shall be incorporated in the comprehensive plan for dredged material management.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 40.

46-6.1-6.
Interagency coordination.

The council and the department shall jointly prepare and adopt, no later than January 1, 2002, protocols and guidelines for coordinated review and action on applications made pursuant to §

46-6.1-6

, which shall among other things provide for:

The elimination of redundant and duplicative processes and reviews;

A joint pre-application meeting with the applicant;

A timely, joint determination of the completeness of applications, following a suitability determination made by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers; and

The designation of a project manager for each dredging application who shall coordinate review of the application and serve as the single point of contact for the applicant.

The council, with advice from the department, shall adopt protocols and a plan for monitoring dredged material disposal sites in the coastal zone, which protocols and plan shall be an element of the comprehensive plan for dredged material management and which provide for oversight by the department of matters that are in its jurisdiction pursuant to authority delegated by federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1.

46-6.1-7.
Applications for approval of dredging, beneficial use, and disposal.

Any person proposing to dredge in the coastal zone, or to dewater or to engage in the beneficial use or disposal of dredged material from the coastal zone, shall be required to obtain approval from the council, and from the department pursuant to §

42-17.1-24

as appropriate, before undertaking such activity. An application for approval or approvals shall be made to the council and shall include, among any other matters that may be required, a statement of how it addresses the priorities for dredged material management set forth in §

46-6.1-2

and of how it is consistent with a plan adopted by the council pursuant to §

46-6.1-5

. Any application for maintenance dredging of dredged material that is suitable for in-water disposal or appropriate for a beneficial use provided for in the comprehensive plan for dredged material management shall be considered as having the priority assigned to a project of critical economic concern pursuant to chapter 117 of title 42 and shall be provided, in order to accomplish the purpose set forth in §

46-6.1-2(2)

, expeditious agency review according to procedures established under §

42-117-8

, as appropriate.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any rule, resolution, or ordinance, adopted under §

31-25-26

, to the contrary, approval by the council shall constitute approval to operate appropriate motor vehicles in a manner necessary to implement the provisions of an approved application.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 40.

46-6.1-8.
Exemption from liability.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Rhode Island general laws to the contrary, whenever the council and the director have approved the beneficial use, dewatering or disposal of dredged material, the applicant, the site owner and/or the site operator, and any successors or assigns, shall not be responsible for any current and future liability that arises out of the approved beneficial use, dewatering or disposal and that is associated with the release or threatened release from the dredged material, provided there is compliance with the conditions imposed by the approval, and further provided that with regard to the beneficial use, dewatering or disposal, the site owner and/or the site operator, and any successors or assigns have acted in a responsible and prudent manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1.

46-6.1-9.
Cooperation of other agencies.

In order to accomplish the purposes of this chapter to provide for beneficial use, dewatering, and disposal of dredged material:

State agencies, departments, corporations, authorities, boards, commissions, including, but not limited to, the department of administration, the department of transportation, the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, the Rhode Island commerce corporation, the Narragansett Bay commission, and the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation, and political subdivisions, shall cooperate with the council in developing and implementing the comprehensive plan for dredged material management;

The council shall seek federal acceptance of the comprehensive plan for dredged material management as an element of the state’s coastal zone management program and shall pursue such federal approvals and general permits as may facilitate expeditious action on dredging applications that are consistent with the plan;

The commerce corporation shall:

Make available by October 31, 2004, a site to use as a dewatering site for dredged material, which site shall be available for dewatering dredged material until at least September 30, 2012, and may continue to be available thereafter for periods of not less than six (6) months, upon the request of the council and the approval of the corporation; and

With advice from the council and the department, develop and implement a program to market dredged material for beneficial use by private persons, including but limited to brownfield reclamation projects; and

The council, with the cooperation of the department and the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, shall develop a proposal for a fund, which may be used as provided for in §

46-12.2-4.1

, to support projects for dewatering dredged material for beneficial use and disposal of dredged material at sites above mean high water and for confined aquatic disposal of dredged materials, which proposal shall be submitted to the general assembly not later than February 15, 2002.

The fund shall not be established or go into effect unless it has been approved by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 584, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 40; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 14.

46-6.1-10.
Transitional provisions.

In order to provide time sufficient for adoption of rules, protocols, guidelines, and plans required by this chapter and to review and act on current dredging projects and applications, the council and the department shall continue in full force and effect such rules, regulations, plans, and programs for dredging, which are not contrary to the purposes of this chapter, until the rules, protocols, guidelines, and plans required by this chapter are adopted; and any rule, regulation, protocol, guideline, or plan, including appendix “B” to the solid waste regulations of the department, that is consistent with the purposes and/or requirements of this chapter, which was prepared or adopted under authority that existed prior to July 10, 2001 shall remain in effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 1.